static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.aff
FLAG num
SFX 224 0 үсә/144 . +Act+Der/са
SFX 224 0 үҙәге/146 . +Act+Der/дағы
SFX 224 0 үле/148 . +Act+Der/лы
SFX 224 0 үһеҙ/152 . +Act+Abe
SFX 224 0 үгәсә/156 . +Act+Der/ҡаса
SFX 224 0 рмен/284 . +Fut+PxSg1
SFX 224 0 мәм/284 . +Fut+PxSg1+Neg
SFX 224 0 мәҫмен/284 . +Fut+PxSg1+Neg
SFX 224 0 рһең/284 . +Fut+PxSg2
SFX 224 0 мәҫһең/284 . +Fut+PxSg2+Neg
SFX 224 0 р/288 . +Fut+PxSg3
SFX 224 0 рҙәр/116 . +Prc+Pl
SFX 224 0 рҙең/118 . +Prc+Gen
SFX 224 0 ргә/122 . +Prc+Dat
SFX 224 0 ргәрәк . +Prc+Dat+Comp
SFX 224 0 рҙе/122 . +Prc+Acc
SFX 224 0 рҙән/118 . +Prc+Abl
SFX 224 0 рҙә/122 . +Prc+Loc
SFX 224 0 рҙәрәк . +Prc+Loc+Comp
SFX 224 0 рмен/127 . +Prc+Pred1Sg
SFX 224 0 рһең/127 . +Prc+Pred2Sg
SFX 224 0 рбеҙ/131 . +Prc+Pred1Pl
SFX 224 0 рһегеҙ/131 . +Prc+Pred2Pl
SFX 224 0 р/196 . +Prc
SFX 224 0 рме . +Prc+Q
SFX 224 0 рмелер . +Prc+Q+Indf
SFX 224 0 рҙер . +Prc+Indf
SFX 224 0 рсе . +Prc+Clt/сы
SFX 224 0 рҙеке/136 . +Prc+Poss
SFX 224 0 ркәй/140 . +Prc+Dim
SFX 224 0 рҙәй/142 . +Prc+Der/дай
SFX 224 0 рсә/144 . +Prc+Der/са
SFX 224 0 рҙәге/146 . +Prc+Der/дағы
SFX 224 0 рле/148 . +Prc+Der/лы
SFX 224 0 рһеҙ/152 . +Prc+Abe
SFX 224 0 ргәсә/156 . +Prc+Der/ҡаса
SFX 224 0 рерәк . +Prc+Comp
SFX 224 0 мәҫ/294 . +Fut+PxSg3+Neg
SFX 224 0 мәҫтәр/116 . +Prc+Pl
SFX 224 0 мәҫтең/118 . +Prc+Gen
SFX 224 0 мәҫкә/122 . +Prc+Dat
SFX 224 0 мәҫкәрәк . +Prc+Dat+Comp
SFX 224 0 мәҫте/122 . +Prc+Acc
SFX 224 0 мәҫтән/118 . +Prc+Abl
SFX 224 0 мәҫтә/122 . +Prc+Loc
SFX 224 0 мәҫтәрәк . +Prc+Loc+Comp
SFX 224 0 мәҫмен/127 . +Prc+Pred1Sg
SFX 224 0 мәҫһең/127 . +Prc+Pred2Sg
SFX 224 0 мәҫбеҙ/131 . +Prc+Pred1Pl
SFX 224 0 мәҫһегеҙ/131 . +Prc+Pred2Pl
SFX 224 0 мәҫ/207 . +Prc
SFX 224 0 мәҫме . +Prc+Q
SFX 224 0 мәҫмелер . +Prc+Q+Indf
SFX 224 0 мәҫтер . +Prc+Indf
SFX 224 0 мәҫсе . +Prc+Clt/сы
SFX 224 0 мәҫтеке/136 . +Prc+Poss
SFX 224 0 мәҫкәй/140 . +Prc+Dim
SFX 224 0 мәҫтәй/142 . +Prc+Der/дай
SFX 224 0 мәҫсә/144 . +Prc+Der/са
SFX 224 0 мәҫтәге/146 . +Prc+Der/дағы
SFX 224 0 мәҫле/148 . +Prc+Der/лы
SFX 224 0 мәҫһеҙ/152 . +Prc+Abe
SFX 224 0 мәҫкәсә/156 . +Prc+Der/ҡаса
SFX 224 0 мәҫерәк . +Prc+Comp
SFX 224 0 рбеҙ/284 . +Fut+PxPl1
SFX 224 0 мәбеҙ/284 . +Fut+PxPl1+Neg
SFX 224 0 мәҫбеҙ/284 . +Fut+PxPl1+Neg
SFX 224 0 рһегеҙ/284 . +Fut+PxPl2
SFX 224 0 мәҫһегеҙ/291 . +Fut+PxPl2+Neg
SFX 224 0 рҙәр/288 . +Fut+PxPl3
SFX 224 0 мәҫтәр/288 . +Fut+PxPl3+Neg
SFX 224 0 ге/301 . +Opt2
SFX 224 0 гем/297 . +Opt2+PxSg1
SFX 224 0 гең/297 . +Opt2+PxSg2
SFX 224 0 геһе/301 . +Opt2+PxSg3
SFX 224 0 гебеҙ/297 . +Opt2+PxPl1
SFX 224 0 гегеҙ/297 . +Opt2+PxPl2
SFX 224 0 геләре/301 . +Opt2+PxPl3
SFX 224 0 йһе/301 . +GerFut3
SFX 224 0 йһерәк . +GerFut3+Comp
SFX 224 0 йһем/297 . +GerFut3+PxSg1
SFX 224 0 йһебеҙ/297 . +GerFut3+PxPl1
SFX 224 0 йһеләре/301 . +GerFut3+PxPl3
SFX 224 0 мәксемен/305 . +FutPlan+PxSg1
SFX 224 0 мәксеһең/305 . +FutPlan+PxSg2
SFX 224 0 мәксе/309 . +FutPlan+PxSg3
SFX 224 0 мәксебеҙ/305 . +FutPlan+PxPl1
SFX 224 0 мәксеһегеҙ/305 . +FutPlan+PxPl2
SFX 224 0 мәкселәр/307 . +FutPlan+PxPl3
SFX 224 0 п/314 . +GerPerf
SFX 224 0 берәк . +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 224 0 мәйенсә/312 . +GerPerf
SFX 224 0 мәйенсәрәк . +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 224 0 мәйсә/312 . +GerPerf
SFX 224 0 мәйсәрәк . +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 224 0 гәнсә/312 . +GerPerf
SFX 224 0 гәнсәрәк . +GerPerf+Comp
SFX 224 0 ргә/318 . +Inf
SFX 224 0 мәҫкә/318 . +Inf+Neg
