static/hunspell/28.01.2024/bash.dic
сәңге/224	[Verb]
мәже/224	[Verb]
бейе/224	[Verb]
бәлйе/224	[Verb]
рәнйе/224	[Verb]
сәнке/224	[Verb]
тиңке/224	[Verb]
сәңке/224	[Verb]
эрке/224	[Verb]
сүке/224	[Verb]
сәке/224	[Verb]
име/224	[Verb]
кәмегәндән-кәме/224	[Verb]
елпе/224	[Verb]
әүере/224	[Verb]
тире/224	[Verb]
эйәре/224	[Verb]
вәғәзсе/224	[Verb]
йәлсе/224	[Verb]
типсе/224	[Verb]
үрәпсе/224	[Verb]
үрсе/224	[Verb]
эҙләнеүсе/224	[Verb]
эҫе/224	[Verb]
кимте/224	[Verb]
тәте/224	[Verb]
бүреһе/224	[Verb]
кейекһе/224	[Verb]
үкһе/224	[Verb]
шемәкһе/224	[Verb]
елһе/224	[Verb]
йәтимһе/224	[Verb]
ирәмһе/224	[Verb]
һәлкәүһе/224	[Verb]
мүкше/224	[Verb]
епше/224	[Verb]
эше/224	[Verb]
тирбә/224	[Verb]
киңгә/224	[Verb]
бүгә/224	[Verb]
деңгелдә/224	[Verb]
кәңгелдә/224	[Verb]
безелдә/224	[Verb]
тәзелдә/224	[Verb]
кәжкелдә/224	[Verb]
бүлкелдә/224	[Verb]
зеңкелдә/224	[Verb]
һеңкелдә/224	[Verb]
ләңкелдә/224	[Verb]
леркелдә/224	[Verb]
сәркелдә/224	[Verb]
үкелдә/224	[Verb]
ләүкелдә/224	[Verb]
һәшкелдә/224	[Verb]
емелдә/224	[Verb]
ләмелдә/224	[Verb]
лепелдә/224	[Verb]
бипелдә/224	[Verb]
елпелдә/224	[Verb]
ләпелдә/224	[Verb]
дерелдә/224	[Verb]
серелдә/224	[Verb]
беселдә/224	[Verb]
елтелдә/224	[Verb]
кертелдә/224	[Verb]
тертелдә/224	[Verb]
геүелдә/224	[Verb]
кәһелдә/224	[Verb]
лепшелдә/224	[Verb]
гөргөлдә/224	[Verb]
һөзөлдә/224	[Verb]
мөйкөлдә/224	[Verb]
мөлкөлдә/224	[Verb]
дөңкөлдә/224	[Verb]
сөңкөлдә/224	[Verb]
сөркөлдә/224	[Verb]
мөймөлдә/224	[Verb]
гөмпөлдә/224	[Verb]
дөпөлдә/224	[Verb]
өрпөлдә/224	[Verb]
гөрөлдә/224	[Verb]
сөрөлдә/224	[Verb]
өлтөлдә/224	[Verb]
мөлтөлдә/224	[Verb]
өфөлдә/224	[Verb]
дөрһөлдә/224	[Verb]
өндә/224	[Verb]
һәпрәндә/224	[Verb]
кеҙә/224	[Verb]
биҙә/224	[Verb]
көйҙә/224	[Verb]
йөҙә/224	[Verb]
төҙә/224	[Verb]
кәүҙә/224	[Verb]
йәшкәҙә/224	[Verb]
һөйә/224	[Verb]
өйкә/224	[Verb]
өмөтһөҙлөккә/224	[Verb]
бөркә/224	[Verb]
еҙлә/224	[Verb]
нигеҙлә/224	[Verb]
кейеҙлә/224	[Verb]
ирекһеҙлә/224	[Verb]
йәмһеҙлә/224	[Verb]
ҡәҙерһеҙлә/224	[Verb]
бәҫһеҙлә/224	[Verb]
биҙлә/224	[Verb]
көҙлә/224	[Verb]
һүҙлә/224	[Verb]
әҙлә/224	[Verb]
елә/224	[Verb]
иҙгелә/224	[Verb]
эйелгелә/224	[Verb]
ишетелгелә/224	[Verb]
килгелә/224	[Verb]
бүлгелә/224	[Verb]
тибенгелә/224	[Verb]
ингелә/224	[Verb]
йүгергелә/224	[Verb]
һиҙҙергелә/224	[Verb]
һикергелә/224	[Verb]
күсергелә/224	[Verb]
күргелә/224	[Verb]
ебәргелә/224	[Verb]
бейеелә/224	[Verb]
һелккелә/224	[Verb]
синкелә/224	[Verb]
һипкелә/224	[Verb]
сәнскелә/224	[Verb]
киҫкелә/224	[Verb]
семеткелә/224	[Verb]
ишеткелә/224	[Verb]
киткелә/224	[Verb]
күперткелә/224	[Verb]
үткелә/224	[Verb]
төҙәткелә/224	[Verb]
себешкелә/224	[Verb]
әшәкелә/224	[Verb]
кирелә/224	[Verb]
әйенселә/224	[Verb]
теләнселә/224	[Verb]
хәйерселә/224	[Verb]
эҫелә/224	[Verb]
ишемтелә/224	[Verb]
елә-елә/224	[Verb]
гөжлә/224	[Verb]
тезлә/224	[Verb]
гизлә/224	[Verb]
һөзлә/224	[Verb]
илә/224	[Verb]
биләгәндән-билә/224	[Verb]
тәпейлә/224	[Verb]
көйлә/224	[Verb]
бел-һөйлә/224	[Verb]
бәйлә/224	[Verb]
мүкәйлә/224	[Verb]
семәкәйлә/224	[Verb]
көләмәйлә/224	[Verb]
тәпәйлә/224	[Verb]
һәйлә/224	[Verb]
еклә/224	[Verb]
эйендеклә/224	[Verb]
ижеклә/224	[Verb]
елеклә/224	[Verb]
эҙәрлеклә/224	[Verb]
тәүлеклә/224	[Verb]
йүгереклә/224	[Verb]
күреклә/224	[Verb]
теклә/224	[Verb]
темтеклә/224	[Verb]
берәмтеклә/224	[Verb]
киртеклә/224	[Verb]
бешеклә/224	[Verb]
биклә/224	[Verb]
сиклә/224	[Verb]
төҙөклә/224	[Verb]
көнлөклә/224	[Verb]
йөгөнөклә/224	[Verb]
сөрөклә/224	[Verb]
төйөнсөклә/224	[Verb]
һөпөсөклә/224	[Verb]
төклә/224	[Verb]
әйҙүклә/224	[Verb]
мүклә/224	[Verb]
кәбәклә/224	[Verb]
һейгәклә/224	[Verb]
төргәклә/224	[Verb]
биҙәклә/224	[Verb]
үҙәклә/224	[Verb]
мәҙәклә/224	[Verb]
һөйәклә/224	[Verb]
сәнскәклә/224	[Verb]
йәбешкәклә/224	[Verb]
иләклә/224	[Verb]
тешләклә/224	[Verb]
күбәләклә/224	[Verb]
бөгәләклә/224	[Verb]
элмәклә/224	[Verb]
көрмәклә/224	[Verb]
һәрмәклә/224	[Verb]
әүмәклә/224	[Verb]
тернәклә/224	[Verb]
күҙгәнәклә/224	[Verb]
өлпәклә/224	[Verb]
өрпәклә/224	[Verb]
сәпәклә/224	[Verb]
елтерәклә/224	[Verb]
ирәклә/224	[Verb]
һөйрәклә/224	[Verb]
көрәклә/224	[Verb]
кәрәклә/224	[Verb]
йәрпесәклә/224	[Verb]
сәсәклә/224	[Verb]
күҫәклә/224	[Verb]
итәклә/224	[Verb]
әүәклә/224	[Verb]
еллә/224	[Verb]
дүрткеллә/224	[Verb]
өшкәүеллә/224	[Verb]
көтәүеллә/224	[Verb]
дәлиллә/224	[Verb]
бәхиллә/224	[Verb]
мөллә/224	[Verb]
тәңгәллә/224	[Verb]
йәллә/224	[Verb]
хәләллә/224	[Verb]
йүтәллә/224	[Verb]
теүәллә/224	[Verb]
һиҙемлә/224	[Verb]
шәлкемлә/224	[Verb]
телемлә/224	[Verb]
күтәремлә/224	[Verb]
исемлә/224	[Verb]
әйтемлә/224	[Verb]
имлә/224	[Verb]
тәғзимлә/224	[Verb]
төркөмлә/224	[Verb]
ғәмлә/224	[Verb]
йәмлә/224	[Verb]
кәмлә/224	[Verb]
биләмлә/224	[Verb]
сәләмлә/224	[Verb]
енлә/224	[Verb]
тибенлә/224	[Verb]
үргенлә/224	[Verb]
тәғәйенлә/224	[Verb]
түркенлә/224	[Verb]
биленлә/224	[Verb]
эренлә/224	[Verb]
әүенлә/224	[Verb]
кәфенлә/224	[Verb]
йәшенлә/224	[Verb]
йөнлә/224	[Verb]
көнлә/224	[Verb]
төтөнлә/224	[Verb]
әрбәнлә/224	[Verb]
йүгәнлә/224	[Verb]
тезәнлә/224	[Verb]
иңкәнлә/224	[Verb]
бизмәнлә/224	[Verb]
шүмәнлә/224	[Verb]
һәрпәнлә/224	[Verb]
һикерәнлә/224	[Verb]
бөкрәнлә/224	[Verb]
дөмрәнлә/224	[Verb]
һөрәнлә/224	[Verb]
бөксәнлә/224	[Verb]
ситәнлә/224	[Verb]
өлтәнлә/224	[Verb]
һемтәнлә/224	[Verb]
һәптәнлә/224	[Verb]
мөстәнлә/224	[Verb]
ирәүәнлә/224	[Verb]
кәкшәнлә/224	[Verb]
зеңлә/224	[Verb]
иңлә/224	[Verb]
үңлә/224	[Verb]
әләңлә/224	[Verb]
түмерәңлә/224	[Verb]
бөксәңлә/224	[Verb]
өҙгөлә/224	[Verb]
гөжгөлә/224	[Verb]
көргөлә/224	[Verb]
бөккөлә/224	[Verb]
һөрткөлә/224	[Verb]
өлпөлә/224	[Verb]
төлә/224	[Verb]
еплә/224	[Verb]
ғәйеплә/224	[Verb]
иплә/224	[Verb]
ғәриплә/224	[Verb]
һиплә/224	[Verb]
өплә/224	[Verb]
көплә/224	[Verb]
төплә/224	[Verb]
бәплә/224	[Verb]
кәплә/224	[Verb]
тәрәплә/224	[Verb]
шәплә/224	[Verb]
леберлә/224	[Verb]
селберлә/224	[Verb]
йәберлә/224	[Verb]
кәндерлә/224	[Verb]
ҡәҙерлә/224	[Verb]
фекерлә/224	[Verb]
лерлә/224	[Verb]
тимерлә/224	[Verb]
леперлә/224	[Verb]
кетерлә/224	[Verb]
сетерлә/224	[Verb]
келтерлә/224	[Verb]
сәтерлә/224	[Verb]
леһерлә/224	[Verb]
сирлә/224	[Verb]
тәфсирлә/224	[Verb]
тирлә/224	[Verb]
гөмбөрлә/224	[Verb]
гөбөрлә/224	[Verb]
сөбөрлә/224	[Verb]
дөңгөрлә/224	[Verb]
мөгөрлә/224	[Verb]
өлдөрлә/224	[Verb]
бөҙөрлә/224	[Verb]
төҫмөрлә/224	[Verb]
мөңөрлә/224	[Verb]
төрлә/224	[Verb]
дөптөрлә/224	[Verb]
мөһөрлә/224	[Verb]
үрлә/224	[Verb]
хәбәрлә/224	[Verb]
тәгәрлә/224	[Verb]
биҙәрлә/224	[Verb]
өйәрлә/224	[Verb]
тәпәрлә/224	[Verb]
хәстәрлә/224	[Verb]
кирбеслә/224	[Verb]
типкеслә/224	[Verb]
бәпеслә/224	[Verb]
өҙгөслә/224	[Verb]
төрткөслә/224	[Verb]
тәкмәслә/224	[Verb]
көләмәслә/224	[Verb]
тиреҫлә/224	[Verb]
дөрөҫлә/224	[Verb]
үтмәҫлә/224	[Verb]
төтәҫлә/224	[Verb]
эркетлә/224	[Verb]
битлә/224	[Verb]
тәштитлә/224	[Verb]
өгөтлә/224	[Verb]
тертлә/224	[Verb]
сәртлә/224	[Verb]
шәрбәтлә/224	[Verb]
ниәтлә/224	[Verb]
һәләтлә/224	[Verb]
рәхмәтлә/224	[Verb]
рәтлә/224	[Verb]
ҡеүәтлә/224	[Verb]
әбеүлә/224	[Verb]
бетеүлә/224	[Verb]
күҙәүлә/224	[Verb]
беләүлә/224	[Verb]
сәсмәүлә/224	[Verb]
ирәүлә/224	[Verb]
зәғифлә/224	[Verb]
мәҙехлә/224	[Verb]
үрешлә/224	[Verb]
теүешлә/224	[Verb]
тәфтишлә/224	[Verb]
өлөшлә/224	[Verb]
тәлгәшлә/224	[Verb]
түбәлә/224	[Verb]
эргәлә/224	[Verb]
беҙәлә/224	[Verb]
кәүҙәлә/224	[Verb]
тәрбиәлә/224	[Verb]
хикәйәлә/224	[Verb]
елкәлә/224	[Verb]
һәптеркәлә/224	[Verb]
рәшәткәлә/224	[Verb]
тәкәлә/224	[Verb]
тәржемәлә/224	[Verb]
өмәлә/224	[Verb]
һөрмәлә/224	[Verb]
һәрмәлә/224	[Verb]
йәтмәлә/224	[Verb]
өшкәмәлә/224	[Verb]
көҙрәлә/224	[Verb]
мәсхәрәлә/224	[Verb]
бетсәлә/224	[Verb]
көйәнтәлә/224	[Verb]
хәстәлә/224	[Verb]
кәштәлә/224	[Verb]
әүшәлә/224	[Verb]
йүрмә/224	[Verb]
инә-инә/224	[Verb]
иһәннә/224	[Verb]
кешнә/224	[Verb]
сәпә/224	[Verb]
биҙрә/224	[Verb]
иҙерә/224	[Verb]
күсеренкерә/224	[Verb]
эреләнеңкерә/224	[Verb]
кәметеңкерә/224	[Verb]
серә/224	[Verb]
селтерә/224	[Verb]
йүнтерә/224	[Verb]
елһерә/224	[Verb]
күгемһерә/224	[Verb]
иләмһерә/224	[Verb]
көйрә/224	[Verb]
күкрә/224	[Verb]
мөңрә/224	[Verb]
мөлдөрә/224	[Verb]
өлгөрөңкөрә/224	[Verb]
өлпөрә/224	[Verb]
көлөмһөрә/224	[Verb]
үрә/224	[Verb]
әүәрә/224	[Verb]
кипсә/224	[Verb]
көҫә/224	[Verb]
төтә/224	[Verb]
эҫтә/224	[Verb]
ирһә/224	[Verb]
киршә/224	[Verb]
